Louisiana, session 2026, HB467.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1730.28.2(A)(4) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1730.28.2. State Uniform Construction Code; requirements and prohibitions
A. The State Uniform Construction Code shall:
* * *
(4) For the entirety of a parish that is located, in whole or in part, in the
coastal zone boundary, as designated by R.S. 49:214.24, require that residential
structures, built on or after January 1, 2027, are built with a roof that meets the latest
fortified roof building standards of the Insurance Institute for Business and Home
Safety and are inspected such that the residential structure receives a certified
fortified roof designation from the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1121 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 467